Hawaii statutes.
[§27-44.1] State liability for data
sets. Data sets shall be available for informational purposes only. The
State does not warrant the fitness of any data set for a particular purpose and
shall not be liable for any deficiencies in the completeness or accuracy of any
data set, except where the State's conduct would constitute gross negligence,
wilful and wanton misconduct, or intentional misconduct. [L 2013, c 263, pt of
§2]

Previous
Vol01_Ch0001-0042F
Next